Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2229
Nursing; license; title or abbreviation; use.

Any person who holds a license to practice as a registered nurse in this state has the right to use the title Registered Nurse and the abbreviation R.N. No other person shall assume or use such title or abbreviation or any words, letters, signs, or devices to indicate that the person using the same is authorized to practice registered nursing.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 10, p. 842;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 43;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 21;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 25;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 28;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,132.18;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 785.